New York, session 2025-2026, S8914.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 27 of section 2.10 of the criminal procedure 2 law, as amended by chapter 664 of the laws of 2004, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 27. New York city special [patrolmen] patrol officers appointed by the 5 police commissioner pursuant to subdivision c or e of section 434a-7.0 6 or subdivision c or e of section 14-106 of the administrative code of 7 the city of New York; provided, however, that nothing in this subdivi- 8 sion shall be deemed to authorize such officer to carry, possess, repair 9 or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor has been 10 issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law and the employer has 11 authorized such officer to possess a firearm during any phase of the 12 officers on-duty employment. Special [patrolmen] patrol officers shall 13 have the powers set forth in section 2.20 of this article only when they 14 are acting pursuant to their special duties; provided, however, that the 15 following categories of New York city special [patrolmen] patrol offi- 16 cers shall have such powers whether or not they are acting pursuant to 17 their special duties: school safety officers employed by the board of 18 education of the city of New York; parking control specialists, [taxi 19 and limousine inspectors,] urban park rangers and evidence and property 20 control specialists employed by the city of New York; and further 21 provided that, with respect to the aforementioned categories of New York 22 city special [patrolmen] patrol officers, where such a special [patrol- 23 man] patrol officer has been appointed by the police commissioner and, 24 upon the expiration of such appointment the police commissioner has 25 neither renewed such appointment nor explicitly determined that such 26 appointment shall not be renewed, such appointment shall remain in full 27 force and effect indefinitely, until such time as the police commission- 28 er expressly determines to either renew or terminate such appointment. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14104-01-5 S. 8914 2 1 § 2. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Taxi and limousine inspectors, whether or not they are acting 4 pursuant to their special duties; provided, however, that nothing in 5 this subdivision shall be deemed to authorize such officer to carry, 6 possess, repair or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate license 7 therefor has been issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.